bg-BG: Железария > Инструменти > Инструменти за боядисване > Бояджийски валяци: Мини валяци; Стандартни валяци; Релефни валяци
sv: Metallprodukter > Verktyg > Målarverktyg > Rollers: Minirollers; Standardrollers; Texturrollers
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Werkzeuge > Malerwerkzeug > Farbrollen: Mini-Farbrollen; Standardrollen; Texturrollen
fi: Rakentaminen > Työkalut > Maalaustyökalut > Maalitelat: Minitelat; Vakiotelat; Kuviotelat
ro-RO: Feronerie > Unelte > Instrumente pentru vopsit > Trafaleți: Trafaleți mini; Trafaleți standard; Trafaleți pentru textură
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Įrankiai > Dažymo įrankiai > Dažymo voleliai: Minivoleliai; Standartiniai voleliai; Tekstūros voleliai
nb: Maskinvare > Verktøy > Maleverktøy > Maleruller: Miniruller; Standardruller; Teksturruller
ko: 철물 > 도구 > 페인트 공구 > 페인트 롤러: 미니 롤러; 표준 롤러; 텍스처 롤러
pt-BR: Ferragens > Ferramentas > Ferramentas para pintura > Rolos de pintura: Mini rolos; Rolos padrão; Rolos com textura
es: Bricolaje > Herramientas > Herramientas de pintura > Rodillos: Mini rodillos; Rodillos estándar; Rodillos de textura
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Инструменты > Малярные инструменты > Малярные валики: Мини-валики; Стандартные валики; Фактурные валики
zh-TW: 硬體 > 工具 > 油漆工具 > 油漆滾筒: 迷你滾輪; 標準滾輪; 紋理滾輪
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Gereedschap > Verfbenodigdheden > Verfrollers: Minirollers; Standaard rollers; Textuurrollers
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Utensili > Articoli per verniciatura > Rulli per vernici: Mini rulli; Rulli standard; Rulli di trama
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Orodja > Orodja za barvanje > Pleskarski valjčki: Mini valjčki; Standardni valjčki; Teksturirani valjčki
en: Hardware > Tools > Paint Tools > Paint Rollers: Mini Rollers; Standard Rollers; Texture Rollers
hr-HR: Željezarija > Alati > Alati za bojanje > Valjci za bojanje: Mini valjci; Standardni valjci; Valjci za teksturu
hu: Hardver > Szerszámok > Festőeszközök > Festőhengerek: Mini hengerek; Szabványos hengerek; Textúrahengerek
ja: DIY用品 > 工具 > 塗装用品 > ペイントローラー: ミニローラー; 標準ローラー; テクスチャローラー
sk-SK: Náradie > Nástroje > Nástroje na maľovanie > Maliarske valčeky: Mini valčeky; Štandardné valčeky; Valčeky s textúrou
pt-PT: Equipamento > Ferramentas > Ferramentas de pintura > Rolos de pintura: Mini rolos; Rolos padrão; Rolos de textura
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > เครื่องมือ > เครื่องมือทาสี > ลูกกลิ้งสี: ลูกกลิ้งขนาดเล็ก; ลูกกลิ้งมาตรฐาน; ลูกกลิ้งพื้นผิว
tr: Hırdavat > Aletler > Boya Aletleri > Boya Ruloları: Mini Rulolar; Standart Rulolar; Dokulu Rulolar
vi: Phần cứng > Công cụ > Dụng cụ sơn > Con lăn sơn: Con lăn nhỏ; Con lăn tiêu chuẩn; Con lăn họa tiết
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Nářadí a nástroje > Malířské nástroje > Malířské válečky: Mini válečky; Standardní válečky; Texturovací válečky
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 工具 > 涂刷工具 > 滚漆筒: 迷你滚筒; 标准滚筒; 纹理滚筒
fr: Quincaillerie > Outils > Outils de peinture > Rouleaux à peinture: Mini-rouleaux; Rouleaux standards; Rouleaux de texture
pl: Sprzęt > Narzędzia > Narzędzia malarskie > Wałki malarskie: Mini wałki; Standardowe wałki; Wałki do teksturowania
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Εργαλεία > Εργαλεία βαφής > Ρολά βαφής: Μίνι ρολά βαφής; Κανονικά ρολά βαφής; Ρολά υφής
da: Isenkram > Redskaber > Maleredskaber > Maleruller: Miniruller; Standardruller; Teksturruller